Hawaii statutes.
[§432:1-410] Reserve credit for
reinsurance. Any society that takes credit for reserves on risks ceded to
a reinsurer shall be subject to provisions of chapter 431 related to credit for
reinsurance. [L 2000, c 74, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next